apertium-kur.kur.twol
Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z â ê î ô û ç ş 
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Â Ê Î Ô Û Ç Ş

 %>:0 %^PREF:0 %^VSUF:0 %^VSUFP:0 %^EPREF:i %^IEPH:0 ;

Sets

Vow = a e i o u 
      â ê î ô û ;

Rules 

! dişo^VSUFim --> dişom
! dişo^VSUFin --> dişon
! çû^VSUFim --> çûm
! dima^VSUFim --> dimam
"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %^VSUF:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

!€ dişo^VSUFim 
!€ dişo000000m

! dişo^VSUFe --> dişo
"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
e:0 <=> Vow %^VSUF:0 _ ;

!€ dişo^VSUFe
!€ dişo000000

! çû^VSUFiye --> çûye
"Deletion of 'i' with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %^VSUF:0 _ y e ;

!€ çû^VSUFiye
!€ çû0000ye

! biçû^VSUFama --> biçûma
"Deletion of 'a' with vowel-ending stem in past conditional"
a:0 <=> Vow %^VSUF:0 _ [ m | n | y ] ;

!€ biçû^VSUFama
!€ biçû000000ma

! dişo^VSUFî --> dişoyî
"Epenthetic 'y' insertion"
%^VSUF:y <=> Vow _ î ;

!€ dişo^VSUFî
!€ dişoy0000î

! ma^VSUFî --> mayî
"Epenthetic 'y' insertion in participle"
%^VSUFP:y <=> [ a | û ] _ î ;

!€ ma^VSUFî
!€ may0000î 

! bibû^VSUFa --> bibûya
"Epenthetic 'y' insertion in past conditional"
%^VSUF:y <=> Vow _ a  ;

!€ bibû^VSUFa
!€ bibûy0000a 

! bibû^VSUFayî --> bibûya
"Epenthetic 'y' insertion in past conditional"
%^VSUF:y <=> Vow _ a  ;

!€ bibû^VSUFa
!€ bibûy0000a 

! d^EPREFaxiv^VSUFim --> daxivim
"Elide 'i' with stems starting with 'a' or 'ê'"
%^EPREF:0 <=> d _ [ a | ê ] ;

!€ d^EPREFaxiv^VSUFim
!€ d000000axiv00000im

! ne^PREFçûi^IEPHbûm -> neçûbûm
"Elide 'i' in past perfect forms"
i:0 <=> Vow _ %^IEPH:0 ;

!€ ne^PREFçûi^IEPHbûm
!€ ne00000çu000000bûm

!> About the rules, the founder of modern Kurdish linguistic, Bedirkhan (or
!> Bedirhan or Bedir-Han), postulated that the long vocals (ê, î, û) should
!> be replaced by e, i, u if the half-vocal "y" follows. That means, yes,
!> this is a general rule. It also applies to some flected forms of "to
!> be", which is "bûn". For instance the plusquamperfect second person
!> singular would be "bûbuyî".
